Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2397
Depositories of public money or public funds; powers.

All depositories of public money or public funds belonging to the State of Nebraska or the political subdivisions in this state shall have full authority to deposit, pledge, or grant a security interest in their assets or to provide a deposit guaranty bond, or any combination thereof, for the security and payment for all such deposits and accretions. The State of Nebraska and any political subdivision in this state and the director, administrator, or custodial official, as applicable, are given the right and authority to accept such deposit, pledge, or grant of a security interest in assets or the provision of a deposit guaranty bond, or any combination thereof.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 5.